North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 21. Advance Health Care Directive Registry.

§ 130A-465.
Advance Health Care Directive Registry establishment.

The Secretary of State shall establish and maintain a statewide, on-line, central registry for advance health care directives. The registry shall be accessible over the Internet through a site maintained by the Secretary of State.

History.
2001-455, s. 1; 2001-513, s. 30(b).

§ 130A-466.
Filing requirements.

A person may submit any of the following documents and the revocations of these documents to the Secretary of State for filing in the Advance Health Care Directive Registry established pursuant to this Article:

A health care power of attorney under Article 3 of Chapter 32A of the General Statutes.

A declaration of a desire for a natural death under Article 23 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.

An advance instruction for mental health treatment under Part 2 of Article 3 of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes.

A declaration of an anatomical gift under Part 3A of Article 16 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes.

Any document and any revocation of a document submitted for filing in the registry shall be notarized regardless of whether notarization is required for its validity. This subsection does not apply to a declaration of an anatomical gift described in subdivision
(a)(4) of this section.

The document may be submitted for filing only by the person who executed the document.

The person who submits the document shall supply a return address.

The document shall be accompanied by any fee required by this Article.

History.
2001-455, s. 1; 2001-513, s. 30(b); 2003-70, s. 1; 2007-538, s. 10.

§ 130A-467.
Validity of unregistered documents.

Failure to register a document with the registry maintained by the Secretary of State pursuant to this Article shall not affect the document’s validity. Failure to notify the Secretary of State of the revocation of a document filed with the registry shall
not affect the validity of a revocation that meets the statutory requirements for the revocation to be valid.

History.
2001-455, s. 1; 2001-513, s. 30(b).

§ 130A-468.
Filing of documents with the registry.

When the Secretary of State receives a document that may be filed with the registry pursuant to this Article, the Secretary shall create a digital reproduction of that document and enter the reproduced document into the registry database. The Secretary
is not required to review a document to ensure that it complies with the particular statutory requirements applicable to the document. Each document entered into the registry database shall be assigned a unique file number and
password.

Upon entering the reproduced document into the registry database, the Secretary shall return the original document and a wallet-size card containing the document’s file number and password to the person who submitted the document.

When the Secretary of State receives a revocation of a document that is filed with the registry and that document’s file number and password, or a request to remove that document from the registry without its revocation, the Secretary shall delete that
document from the registry database.

The Secretary of State’s entry of a document into, or removal of a document from, the registry database does not do any of the following:

Affect the validity of the document in whole or in part.

Relate to the accuracy of information contained in the document.

Create a presumption regarding the validity of the document, regarding the accuracy of information contained in the document, or that the statutory requirements for the document have been met.

History.
2001-455, s. 1; 2001-513, s. 30(b); 2007-502, s. 16.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-502, s. 16, effective October 1, 2007, inserted “or a request to remove that document from the registry without its revocation” in subsection (c); inserted “or removal of a document from” in subsection (d).

§ 130A-469.
Disclosure of information contained in the registry.

The registry shall be accessible only over the Internet. A document filed in the registry shall be accessible only if a person attempting to access the document enters both the file number and password of the document. Documents filed in the registry,
file numbers, passwords, and any other information maintained by the Secretary of State under this Article shall not be subject to disclosure pursuant to Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

History.
2001-455, s. 1; 2001-513, s. 30(b).

§ 130A-470.
Fees for using the registry; other funds for the registry.

The Secretary of State shall charge a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for filing a document, other than a revocation, with the registry. The Secretary of State shall not charge a fee for filing a revocation with the registry. The fee shall be applied to the
cost of maintaining the registry and to promoting public education and awareness of the registry.

The Secretary of State, on behalf of the State, may accept gifts, donations, devises, and other forms of voluntary contributions; may apply for grants from public and private sources; and may expend funds received under this subsection for the purpose
of promoting public education and awareness of the registry.

All fees, funds, and gifts received pursuant to this section shall be subject to audit by the State Auditor and shall be expended in conformity with Chapter 143C of the General Statutes.

History.
2001-455, s. 1; 2001-513, s. 30(b); 2006-203, s. 70; 2011-284, s. 89.

§ 130A-471.
Limitation of liability.

The State of North Carolina, the Secretary of State, and any agent or person employed by the Secretary of State shall not be liable for any claims or demands arising out of the administration or operation of the registry authorized by this Article, except
for acts of gross negligence, willful misconduct, or intentional wrongdoing.

History.
2001-455, s. 1; 2001-513, s. 30(b).

§§ 130A-472 through 130A-474.

Reserved for future codification purposes.